Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2944
Affected animal, herd, or flock; affected premises; owner or custodian; duties; duty to report

(1) The owner or custodian of an affected animal, herd, or flock or affected premises may be required by the department to develop a written animal, herd, or flock management plan.

(2) Any affected premises may be required to be cleaned, disinfected, destroyed, or disposed of, or any combination thereof, to prevent transmission and spread of dangerous disease from one premises to another, or from one group of animals to another, when deemed necessary by the State Veterinarian.

(3) It is the duty of any person who discovers, suspects, or has reason to believe that any animal belonging to him or her, or which he or she has in his or her possession or custody, or which belonging to another person may come under his or her observation, is an affected animal to immediately report such fact, belief, or suspicion to the department or its agent, employee, or appointee.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 44.